District of Columbia statutes.
4-1704.02

LRAP; administration.

(a)

The Administrator shall:

(1)

Establish an application and eligibility review process for the LRAP;

(2)

Conduct a semiannual review of the continued eligibility of participants;

(3)

Certify a list of eligible employment; and

(4)

Determine the levels of participant contribution.

(b)

The Administrator shall provide loans to participants who maintain eligible employment to repay eligible debt for reasonable education expenses associated with obtaining a law degree. The Administrator shall forgive these loans upon a participant’s completion of the required service obligation.

History

Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 402
as added Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 3002(b), 58 DCR 6226

Section References

This section is referenced in § 4-1704.05.